Utah, session 2026, HB201.
Section 1. Section 59-24-103.8 is amended to read:59-24-103.8Effective 05/06/26Repealed 07/01/26. Radioactive waste facility expansion tax -- Payment -- Deposit of tax revenue.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Division" means the Division of Waste Management and Radiation Control created in Section 19-1-105.(b)"New licensed waste disposal volume" means the increased radioactive waste disposal volume capacity that a radioactive waste facility requests for approval by the division in a radioactive waste facility application.(c)"Radioactive waste facility application" means an application for a new radioactive waste facility, or an amendment to an existing radioactive waste facility, under Section 19-3-105 that requests authorization to construct a new radioactive waste facility or expand the geographic site covered by an existing radioactive waste facility.(2)There is imposed a tax on a radioactive waste facility that submits a new radioactive waste facility application to the division on or before December 31, 20252026.(3)The tax imposed by this section is equal to $3.45 per cubic yard of new licensed waste disposal volume, up to and not exceeding 8,700,000 cubic yards of new licensed waste disposal volume for a radioactive waste facility.(4)The tax imposed by this section shall be paid no later than 60 days after the day on which the radioactive waste facility submits a radioactive waste facility application to the division.(5)The commission shall deposit the tax revenue collected under this section into the Electrical Energy Development Investment Fund created in Section 79-6-1105.(6)Nothing in this section limits the ability of the director of the division to approve a radioactive waste facility application exceeding the maximum new licensed waste disposal volume described in Subsection (3).

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 63I-2-259 is amended to read:63I-2-259Effective 05/06/26. Repeal dates: Title 59.(1)Subsection 59-7-159(3)(b)(iii), referencing Section 59-7-614.10, is repealed December 31, 2026.(2)Section 59-7-614.10, Nonrefundable enterprise zone tax credit, is repealed December 31, 2026.(3)Subsection 59-10-137(3)(b)(viii), referencing Section 59-10-1037, is repealed December 31, 2026.(4)Section 59-10-1037, Nonrefundable enterprise zone tax credit, is repealed December 31, 2026.(5)Subsection 59-14-807(3)(a)(iii), regarding the Youth Electronic Cigarette, Marijuana, and Other Drug Prevention Committee, is repealed July 1, 2030.(6)Subsection 59-14-807(4)(b), regarding the Youth Electronic Cigarette, Marijuana, and Other Drug Prevention Committee, is repealed July 1, 2030.(7)Section 59-24-103.8, Radioactive waste facility expansion tax -- Payment -- Deposit of tax revenue, is repealed July 1, 20262027.

Section 3:
Section 3.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.